Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-621
Electronic signature, defined.

Electronic signature means an electronic sound, symbol, or process attached to or logically associated with a record and executed or adopted by a person with the intent to sign the record.

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 383.